Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1528
Person receiving conveyance; action; not barred.

Nothing in the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act shall be construed to bar a common-law, statutory, or any other cause of action which may be maintained against a responsible person by a private person who, subsequent to a release, received a conveyance of any right, title, or interest in the parcel of real property on which such release occurred.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 28.